Utah statutes.
63A-12-100.5.   Definitions.

(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (2), the definitions in Section 63G-2-103 apply to this chapter.

(2)  As used in this chapter, "division" or "state archives" means the Division of Archives and Records Service.



Amended by Chapter 265, 2011 General Session

